District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-303.13

Costs and fees.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 312, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 313, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(13), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.12.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.12

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in subsec. (c), deleted “(enforcement and modification of support order after registration)” following “this chapter”.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Former § 46-303.13 has been recodified as § 46-303.14 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(14).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 313 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).